Utah statutes.
76-7-328.   Hearing to determine necessity of physician's conduct.
(1)  A physician accused of an offense under Section 76-7-326 may seek a
hearing before the Physicians Licensing Board created in Section 58-67-201, or
the Osteopathic Physician and Surgeon's Licensing Board created in Section
58-68-201 on whether the physician's conduct was necessary to save the life of
the mother whose life was endangered by a physical disorder, physical illness,
or physical injury, including a life endangering physical condition caused by
or arising from the pregnancy itself.
(2)  The findings on that issue are admissible on that issue at the trial of
the physician.  Upon a motion from the physician, the court shall delay the
beginning of the trial for not more than 30 days to permit such a hearing to
take place.
